Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-820.01
Insurance proceeds insufficient to reconstruct buildings; co-owners liable; property owned by co-owners; effect.

Unless otherwise provided in the master deed or bylaws, if the insurance proceeds are insufficient to reconstruct the building or buildings, or other property, damage to or destruction of the building or buildings or other property caused by fire or other disaster shall be promptly repaired and restored by the board of administrators, using proceeds of insurance for that purpose, and the co-owners directly affected by the damage shall be liable for assessment for any deficiency. Such deficiency shall be borne by such co-owners in proportion to the value of their respective apartments as reflected by the basic values referred to in sections 76-806 and 76-809, except that if three-fourths or more of the building or buildings constituting the entire condominium property regime are destroyed or substantially damaged and if the co-owners, by a vote of at least three-fourths of such co-owners, do not voluntarily, within one hundred days after such destruction or damage, make provision for reconstruction, the board of administrators shall record, with the register of deeds, a notice setting forth such facts, and upon the recording of such notice:

(1) The property shall be deemed to be owned in common by the co-owners;

(2) The undivided interest in the property owned in common which shall appertain to each co-owner shall be the percentage of undivided interest previously owned by such owner in the common elements;

(3) Any liens affecting any of the units shall be deemed to be transferred in accordance with the existing priorities to the undivided interest of the unit owner in the property; and

(4) The property shall be subject to an action for partition at the suit of any co-owner, in which event the net proceeds of sale, together with the net proceeds of the insurance on the property, shall be considered as one fund and shall be divided among all the co-owners in a percentage equal to the percentages and basic values of each co-owner in the property as referred to in sections 76-806 and 76-809, after first paying out of the respective shares of the co-owners, to the extent sufficient for such purpose, all liens on the undivided interest in the property owned by each co-owner.

Laws 1974, LB 730, § 12.